Hawaii, session 2025, GM1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that electric vehicle
usage in the State has grown dramatically, with a twenty-three
per cent increase in the number of registered electric vehicles
from October 2023 to October 2024. As electric vehicle usage
increases, more electric vehicle batteries will enter the waste
stream. Proper recycling and disposal practices are needed to
ensure that electric vehicle batteries do not contribute to
environmental harm.
The purpose of this Act is to establish a working group to
examine how to maximize the recycling and reuse of electric
vehicle batteries and recommend electric vehicle battery
management practices.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established within the Hawaii
state energy office an electric vehicle battery recycling and
reuse working group to examine how to maximize the recycling and
reuse of electric vehicle batteries and recommend electric
vehicle battery management practices.
2025-3503 HB242 CDl HMSO
iHiiMiiiiiniiiaiiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO. "
i
C.D. 1
(b) The working group shall:
(1) Develop a plan for best management practices for the
recycling, reuse, or repurposing of electric vehicle
batteries;
(2) Coordinate with any other organization, working group,
or relevant entity within or outside of the State that
has similar objectives as the working group, or is
researching the recycling, reuse, or repurposing of
electric vehicle batteries; and
(3) Develop policy recommendations for the legislature to
implement based on the working group's findings.
(c) The working group shall consist of:
(1) The chief energy officer, or the chief energy
officer's designee, who shall serve as the
co-chairperson of the working group;
(2) The director of health, or the director's designee,
who shall serve as the co-chairperson of the working
group;
(3) One representative from the department of
environmental services of the city and county of
Honolulu; and
2025’’3503 HB242 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO. SS.,
C.D. 1
(4) One representative from the Hawaii natural energy
institute.
(d) The co-chairpersons of the working group shall invite
the following individuals to serve as members of the working
group:
(1) Two representatives from the electric vehicle
manufacturing industry;
(2) One representative from the automotive repair
industry;
(3) One representative from the battery energy storage
industry;
(4) One representative from the electronic waste recycling
industry;
(5) One representative from an electric utility;
(6) One representative from an organization that
specializes in extended producer responsibility
policy;
(7) One representative from an environmental organization
that specializes in waste reduction and recycling;
(8) One representative from the automotive recycling
industry;
2025-3503 HB242 GDI HMSO 3

Page 4
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(9) One representative from a company specializing in the
recycling of electric vehicle batteries; and
(10) Other individuals as invited by the co-chairpersons.
(e) The working group shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations, including any proposed
legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of the regular session of 2027. The report
shall include an analysis of:
(1) Opportunities for and barriers to the reuse of
electric vehicle batteries as a first option, as
potential stationary energy storage systems as a
second option, and for recycling as a third option,
taking into account the additional costs of
transporting electric vehicle batteries to be recycled
out of State;
(2) Best practices for the management of electric vehicle
batteries at end-of-life;
(3) The cost, safety, and environmental impacts of
in-state versus out-of-state recycling options;
(4) The feasibility of pursuing any recycling options
outside of the United States;
2025-3503 HB242 GDI HMSO
iiiiiniiHiiiiiiiiiiiviii

Page 5 242
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(5) The feasibility in terms of costs, available
infrastructure, and enforcement of an electric vehicle
battery recycling program;
(6) The overall effect of different management practices
on the environment; and
(7) Any other factors deemed necessary and relevant.
(f) The working group shall be dissolved on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3503 HB242 CDl HMSO 5
lllllilillllllllllllHIHIII

H.B. NO. g.i
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 242, HD 1,SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 242, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, HawaiT 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
223